Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201319-5208
Land bank; acquire property; limits;
maintenance; accept transfer from land reutilization authority.

(1) A land
bank may acquire real property or interests in real property by gift, devise,
transfer, exchange, foreclosure, purchase, or otherwise on terms and conditions
and in a manner the land bank considers proper.

(2) A land
bank may acquire real property or interests in real property by purchase contracts,
lease-purchase agreements, installment sales contracts, or land contracts
and may accept transfers from political subdivisions upon such terms and conditions
as agreed to by the land bank and the political subdivision. Notwithstanding
any other law to the contrary, any political subdivision may transfer to the
land bank real property and interests in real property of the political subdivision
on such terms and conditions and according to such procedures as determined
by the political subdivision.

(3) A land bank shall maintain all of its
real property in accordance with the laws and ordinances of the jurisdiction
in which the real property is located.

(4) A land bank shall not own or hold real
property located outside the jurisdictional boundaries of the municipality
or municipalities that created the land bank. For purposes of this subsection,
jurisdictional boundaries of a municipality does not include the extraterritorial
zoning jurisdiction of such municipality.

(5) A land bank may accept transfers of
real property and interests in real property from a land reutilization authority
on such terms and conditions, and according to such procedures, as mutually
determined by the transferring land reutilization authority and the land bank.

(6) A land bank
shall not hold legal title at any one time to more than seven percent of the
total number of parcels of real property located in the municipality or municipalities
that created the land bank.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 8.